Florida, session 2026, SB804.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSection 320.08001, Florida Statutes, is amended 14 to read: 15 320.08001âElectric vehicles; license tax; fee.â 16 (1)âThe license tax for an electric vehicle or low-speed 17 vehicle is the same as that prescribed in s. 320.08 for a 18 vehicle that is not electrically powered. 19 (2)(a)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âbattery 20 electric vehicleâ means a motor vehicle powered solely by an 21 electric motor drawing current from rechargeable batteries and 22 which is not equipped with an internal combustion engine. 23 (b)âIn addition to the license tax imposed under subsection 24 (1) and any other fee imposed under this chapter, the owner of a 25 battery electric vehicle registered in this state must pay an 26 annual fee of $250 at the time of initial registration and each 27 renewal thereafter. 28 (c)âFees collected under this subsection must be deposited 29 into the State Transportation Trust Fund and used for the 30 planning, construction, maintenance, and repair of public roads 31 and transportation infrastructure. 32 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.